src/morphology/affixes/conjunctors.lexc
LEXICON ConjTag
+Conj: # ;
LEXICON av/coTag
+Conj: # ;
LEXICON av/pa/coTag
+Conj: # ;
LEXICON co/in/paTag
+Conj: # ;
LEXICON co/paTag
+Conj: # ;
LEXICON in/coTag
+Conj: # ;
LEXICON pa/coTag
+Conj: # ;
LEXICON pa/in/coTag
+Conj: # ;
LEXICON po/coTag
+Conj: # ;
LEXICON pr/coTag
+Conj: # ;
